Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.400

Registration of out-of-state registrants.

The director may, upon receipt of the current registration fee, grant a certificate of registration to an applicant who is a registered architect in another state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, or another country, if that individual's qualifications and experience are determined by the board to be equivalent to the qualifications and experience required of a person registered under RCW 18.08.350.

[ 1985 c 37 s 11.]